Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Article 3. Communications in Electronic Storage.

Sec. 12.37.300.
Authorization for access to and use of communications in electronic storage.

Upon application by a peace officer made in conformity with any provision of federal law authorizing such an application, a court may issue an order authorizing or concerning access to and disclosure or use of communications in electronic storage as permitted under federal law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 61 SLA 1993)